tools/nvda/louis/tables/hu-hu-g2_exceptions.cti
always haranggal 125-1-1235-1-1345-1245-1236
always vagonnal 1236-1-1245-135-1345-1236
always ingatlannal 24-1345-1245-1-2345-123-1-1345-1236
always vendéggel 1236-15-1345-145-16-1245-1236
always doppinggal 145-135-1234-1234-24-1345-1245-1236
always dőlésszöggel 145-12456-123-16-234-156-12345-1245-1236
always dramaturggal 145-1235-1-134-1-2345-136-1235-1245-1236
always édességgel 16-145-15-234-234-16-1245-1236
always egyezséggel 15-1456-15-126-234-16-1245-1236
always kuponnal 13-136-1234-135-1345-1236
always elektronnal 15-123-15-13-2345-1235-135-1345-1236
always hűséggel 125-23456-234-16-1245-1236
always méreggel 134-16-1235-15-1245-1236
always ellenséggel 15-123-123-15-1345-234-16-1245-1236
always dásszámmal 145-4-234-156-4-134-1236
always érdekességgel 16-1235-145-15-13-15-234-234-16-1245-1236
always értelmiséggel 16-1235-2345-15-123-134-24-234-16-1245-1236
always szavarral 234-126-1-1236-1-1235-1236
always lánggal 123-4-1345-1245-1236
always többséggel 2345-12345-12-12-234-16-1245-1236
always sablonnal 234-1-12-123-135-1345-1236
always filmintézettel 124-24-123-134-24-1345-2345-16-126-15-2345-1236
always flakonnal 124-123-1-13-135-1345-1236
always fogasszíjjal 124-135-1245-1-234-156-34-245-1236
always furgonnal 124-136-1235-1245-135-1345-1236
always stadionnal 234-2345-1-145-24-135-1345-1236
always kabinnal 13-1-12-24-1345-1236
always gallonnal 1245-1-123-123-135-1345-1236
always zsugárral 126-234-136-1245-4-1235-1236
always mikrofonnal 134-24-13-1235-135-124-135-1345-1236
always gerebennel 1245-15-1235-15-12-15-1345-1236
always ginsenggel 1245-24-1345-234-15-1345-1245-1236
always kartonnal 13-1-1235-2345-135-1345-1236
always gluténnal 1245-123-136-2345-16-1345-1236
always gluténnel 1245-123-136-2345-16-1345-1236
always nemezzel 1345-15-134-15-126-1236
always húshagyókeddel 125-346-234-125-1-1456-246-13-15-145-145-15-123
always aiszóposszal 1-24-156-246-135-135-156-1236
always borsóbükkönnyel 12-135-1235-234-246-12-12356-13-13-12345-1246-1236
always brutasszal 12-1235-136-2345-1-156-1236
always bűnnel 12-23456-1345-1236
always crixusszal 14-1235-24-1346-136-156-1236
always pennysekkel 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-234-15-13-1236
always pennyvel 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-1236
always pennykkel 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-13-1236
always pennyével 1234-15-1345-1345-13456-16-1236
always sopronnal 234-135-1234-1235-135-1345-1236
always kalauzzal 13-1-123-1-136-126-1236
always hazugsággal 125-1-126-136-1245-234-4-1245-1236
always helyszínnel 125-15-456-156-34-1345-1236
always hírességgel 125-34-1235-15-234-234-16-1245-1236
always hollywooddal 125-135-123-123-13456-2456-135-145-1236
always hússzaggal 125-346-234-156-1-1245-1236
always idegennel 24-145-15-1245-15-1345-1236
always záloggal 126-4-123-135-1245-1236
always jonesszal 245-135-1345-15-156-1236
always kalózzal 13-1-123-246-126-1236
always kamionnal 13-1-134-24-135-1345-1236
always kansasszel 13-1-1345-234-1-156-1236
always karbonnal 13-1-1235-12-135-1345-1236
always kéjjel 13-16-245-1236
always szölddel 234-126-12345-123-145-1236
always kereszténységgel 13-15-1235-15-156-2345-16-1246-234-16-1245-1236
always ördöggel 12345-1235-145-12345-1245-1236
always kívánsággal 13-34-1236-4-1345-234-4-1245-1236
always kokainnal 13-135-13-1-24-1345-1236
always röntgennel 1235-12345-1345-2345-1245-15-1345-1236
always kötelességgel 13-12345-2345-15-123-15-234-234-16-1245-1236
always kuplunggal 13-136-1234-123-136-1345-1245-1236
always lábcinnel 123-4-12-14-24-1345-1236
always népességgel 1345-16-1234-15-234-234-16-1245-1236
always lakossággal 123-1-13-135-234-234-4-1245-1236
always lexikonnal 123-15-1346-24-13-135-1345-1236
always marcipánnal 134-1-1235-14-24-1234-4-1345-1236
always porcelánnal 1234-135-1235-14-15-123-4-1345-1236
always mássággal 134-4-234-234-4-1245-1236
always matrózzal 134-1-2345-1235-246-126-1236
always mediánnal 134-15-145-24-4-1345-1236
always mézsörrel 134-16-126-234-12345-1235-1236
always vulkánnal 1236-136-123-13-4-1345-1236
always morfinnal 134-135-1235-124-24-1345-1236
always tehénnel 2345-15-125-16-1345-1236
always végtaggal 1236-16-1245-2345-1-1245-1236
always szebennel 156-15-12-15-1345-1236
always vázsonnyal 1236-4-345-135-1246-1236
always neutronnal 1345-15-136-2345-1235-135-1345-1236
always newtonnal 1345-15-2456-135-1345-1236
always nukleonnal 1345-136-13-123-15-135-1345-1236
always ostobasággal 135-234-2345-135-12-1-234-4-1245-1236
always oxigénnel 135-1346-24-1245-16-1345-1236
always őzsöréttel 12456-126-234-12345-1235-16-2345-1236
always panteonnal 1234-1-1345-2345-15-135-1345-1236
always platánnal 1234-123-1-2345-4-1345-1236
always radiánnal 1235-1-145-24-4-1345-1236
always ritkasággal 1235-24-2345-13-1-234-4-1245-1236
always szarvaszsírral 156-1-1235-1236-1-234-345-34-1235-1236
always szsákkal 234-345-4-13-1236
always tízzel 2345-34-126-1236
always topázzal 2345-135-1234-4-126-1236
always vaszillal 1236-1-156-24-123-1236
always végtelennel 1236-15-1245-2345-15-123-15-1345-1236
always gonddal 1245-145-1236
always gyorssal 1456-234-1236
always röviddel 1235-145-1236
always teljessel 2345-234-1236
always minddel 134-145-1236
always szabaddal 156-145-1236
always árral 4-1235-1236
word lomban =
noback pass2 @134-15-1456-1456-15-123 @134-15-1456-1236
